Arkansas, session 2025, SB546.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 8-4-203(b)(1)(E), concerning a National
Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit, is amended to read as follows:
(E)(i) The division shall not consider an application to
issue or modify to increase the design flow of a National Pollutant Discharge
Elimination System permit or state permit for a nonmunicipal domestic sewage
treatment works within five (5) miles of a publicly owned treatment works’
collection system unless:
(a) The division determines there is
significant threat of pollution without the issuance or modification of the
nonmunicipal domestic sewage treatment works permit; or
(b) The applicant seeking approval
demonstrates that there is no other viable cost-effective alternative by
submitting a feasibility study for the connection to the existing publicly
owned treatment works that has a collection system within five (5) miles of
*JMB566*
04-09-2025 11:10:21 JMB566

As Engrossed: H4/9/25 SB546
the proposed treatment works.
(ii) Except as provided under subdivisions
(b)(1)(C)(vi) and (b)(1)(E)(ii) (b)(1)(E)(iii) of this section, the division
shall not issue, renew, or transfer permit coverage for nonmunicipal domestic
sewage treatment works to property owners' associations or homeowners'
associations after January 1, 2018.
(ii)(iii) A property owners' association or
homeowners' association with permit coverage before December 31, 2017, may
retain permit coverage if the property owners' association or homeowners'
association complies with this section.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 8-4-203(b)(2), concerning expired language
to reduce or waive the amount of the required financial assurance for a
National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit, is repealed.
(2) Until January 1, 2016, the Arkansas Department of
Environmental Quality or the division may reduce or waive the amount of the
required financial assurance if the permit applicant can demonstrate to the
Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality's or the division's satisfaction
that:
(A) For a renewal permit, during the five (5) years
preceding the application for a renewal permit, the nonmunicipal domestic
sewage treatment works has:
(i) Maintained the nonmunicipal domestic sewage
treatment works in continuous operation;
(ii) Maintained the nonmunicipal domestic sewage
treatment works in substantial compliance with the existing discharge permit
issued by the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality or the division,
which shall be demonstrated by submitting the following:
(a) All discharge monitoring reports;
(b) Evidence that the nonmunicipal domestic
sewage treatment works has not exceeded the same permit effluent criteria in
any two (2) consecutive monitoring periods during the previous three (3)
years;
(c) Evidence that no more than ten percent
(10%) of the nonmunicipal domestic sewage treatment works' submitted
discharge monitoring reports show effluent violations; and
04-09-2025 11:10:21 JMB566

As Engrossed: H4/9/25 SB546
(d) Evidence that there have not been any
administrative or judicial orders entered against the owner or operator for
violations of state or federal environmental laws, rules, or regulations or
permits issued by the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality or the
division;
(iii) Maintained the services of a certified
wastewater treatment operator, where applicable;
(iv)(a) Remained financially solvent, which shall be
demonstrated by either:
(1) The nonmunicipal domestic sewage
treatment works' federal tax returns for the five (5) years preceding the
application for a renewal permit and a sworn affidavit from a corporate
official or other responsible official representing the nonmunicipal domestic
sewage treatment works that lists all assets and liabilities for the
nonmunicipal domestic sewage treatment works; or
(2) An independent certified public
accountant's report on the owner's or operator's independently reviewed
financial statements.
(b) The review of financial statements under
subdivision (b)(2)(A)(iv)(a)(2) of this section shall be conducted in
accordance with the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants'
Professional Standards, as they existed on January 1, 2013; and
(v) Operated the nonmunicipal domestic sewage
treatment works to prevent the discharge of waterborne pollutants in
unacceptable concentrations to the surface waters or groundwater of the state
as defined in the permit or as defined in the state's water quality
standards; or
(B) For a new permit:
(i) The reduction or waiver is necessary to
accommodate important economic or social development in the area of the
proposed nonmunicipal domestic sewage treatment works; and
(ii) The applicant has shown a history of financial
responsibility and compliance with regulatory requirements.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 8-4-203(b)(4)(B)(ii)(b) - (d), concerning
initial trust fund contribution fees for water permittees, are amended to
04-09-2025 11:10:21 JMB566

As Engrossed: H4/9/25 SB546
read as follows:
(b) The initial trust fund contribution fee
required by the division for a new nonmunicipal domestic sewage treatment
works is ten percent (10%) eight percent (8%), not to exceed one hundred
thousand dollars ($100,000), of the estimated cost of construction of the new
nonmunicipal domestic sewage treatment works as certified by the engineer of
record.
(c) The initial trust fund contribution fee
required by the division for modifications to existing nonmunicipal domestic
sewage treatment works is ten percent (10%) eight percent (8%), not to exceed
one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), of the estimated cost of
construction for the modification of the nonmunicipal domestic sewage
treatment works as certified by the engineer of record.
(d) The division shall may reduce the initial
trust fund contribution fee if:
(1) The nonmunicipal domestic sewage
treatment works is subject to an enforcement action; and
(2) The corrective actions approved by
the division would require the nonmunicipal domestic sewage treatment works
to make an initial trust fund contribution.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 8-4-203(b)(4)(B)(iv)(a)(2), concerning
trust fund contribution fees for water permittees, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) The division has issued that
nonmunicipal domestic sewage treatment facility's third second permit renewal
following its initial trust fund contribution.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 8-4-203(b)(4)(D), concerning trust fund
contribution fees for water permittees, is amended to read as follows:
(D) If the total amount in the fund equals or exceeds two
million one hundred thousand dollars ($2,100,000), additional annual trust
fund contribution fees as described in subdivision (b)(4)(B)(iii) of this
section shall not be collected by the division until the total amount of the
fund equals or is less than one million five hundred thousand dollars
($1,500,000), at which time the collection of required trust fund
04-09-2025 11:10:21 JMB566

As Engrossed: H4/9/25 SB546
contribution fees shall resume.

/s/K. Hammer

































04-09-2025 11:10:21 JMB566